Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1822.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 44 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a chapter to read:CHAPTER 9PUBLIC SERVANT DATA PRIVACYSec.901. Scope of chapter.902. Findings and declarations.903. Definitions.904. Nondisclosure of protected information.905. Enforcement.906. Construction.<--123456789101112131415161718 § 901. Scope of chapter.This chapter provides for public servant data privacy.§ 902. Findings and declarations.The General Assembly finds and declares as follows:(1) Judges, lawmakers and other elected and appointed public servants and their staff play an essential role in the free and fair functioning of our government. While the nature of their official duties will undoubtedly draw occasional disapproval and criticism from members of the public, our public servants and their families have experienced sharp increases in recent years in the volume and severity of intimidating abuse, threats and violent attacks, including attempted assassinations, some of which have been perpetrated by malefactors obtaining the home addresses or other unlisted contact information of their targets.(2) These threats and attacks create a chilling effect and constrain how freely our officials interact with the public, narrows the spectrum of positions they feel safe to take or support and make them less willing to continue in public service. This persistent and severe problem is an affront to the effective functioning of our government and the rule of law.(3) Violence against and intimidation of our public servants and their families is made easier by data brokers disseminating private information, enabling assailants to easily compile dossiers on the public officials the assailants target.(4) Having personal information easily accessible at the click of a button provides negligible value to the public and poses grave danger to our public officials and their 20250HB1822PN2520 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 families.(5) This chapter is implemented to foster the ability of these public servants who perform critical governmental roles to carry out their official duties without fear of personal reprisal.§ 903. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this chapter shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Assignee." A person or entity to whom a person's right to bring a civil action for a violation of section 904 (relating to nondisclosure of protected information) has been assigned, in writing, by the covered person or their authorized agent."Associated person." The following:(1) An individual connected to a principal person by one of the following relationships:(i) A parent, spouse, child or grandchild of a principal person.(ii) A person sharing custody of a minor child with a principal person.(iii) A person sharing a primary residence with a principal person.(2) An individual whose main job duties and responsibilities include providing direct support to a principal person in fulfilling the principal person's obligations to the public."Authorized agent." Any of the following persons or entities authorized to submit or revoke a request for nondisclosure of protected information on behalf of a covered person and to engage in communications and enforcement:20250HB1822PN2520 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (1) A designated trustee or other agent acting under a written power of attorney or other legal instrument on behalf of any covered person who is physically or mentally incapacitated.(2) A parent or legal guardian on behalf of any child, who is a minor, who is otherwise entitled to nondisclosure under this act.(3) A person or entity that has been appointed under a written power of attorney by a covered person to act on their behalf with respect to this chapter.(4) An agent acting on behalf of a Federal judge, a designee of the United States Marshals Service or the clerk of any United States District Court."Covered person." A principal person or associated person. "Data broker." A person or entity that discloses the protected information of an individual to a third party. The term does not include a governmental agency or its representatives acting in an official capacity."Disclose." To solicit, sell, manufacture, give, provide, lend, trade, mail, deliver, transfer, post, publish, distribute, circulate, disseminate, present, exhibit, advertise, offer or include within a searchable list or database, regardless of whether any other person or entity has actually searched the list or database for the person's information."Home address." A dwelling location at which an individual resides and includes the physical address, mailing address, street address, parcel identification number, plot identification number, legal property description, neighborhood name and lot number, GPS coordinates and any other descriptive property information that may reveal the home address.20250HB1822PN2520 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 "Home telephone number." A telephone number used primarily for personal communications or associated with personal communications devices, including a landline or cellular number."Judge." Any judge, judicial officer or magisterial district judge, as defined in 42 Pa.C.S. § 102 (relating to definitions)."Principal person." Any active, formerly active or retired:(1) judge;(2) public official as defined in 65 Pa.C.S. § 1102 (relating to definitions); or(3) person who holds or previously held a Federal position or a position in this Commonwealth or another state comparable to those identified in paragraph (1) or (2) and who has a home address in this Commonwealth."Protected information." The term includes:(1) A home address, including a primary residence or secondary residences.(2) A home telephone number.(3) A personal email address.(4) A Social Security number or driver's license number.(5) A license plate number or other unique identifiers of a vehicle owned, leased or regularly used by the covered person.§ 904. Nondisclosure of protected information.(a) Prohibition.--A covered person or their authorized agent seeking to prohibit the disclosure by a data broker of protected information of the covered person shall provide written notice to the data broker referencing this act and requesting that the data broker cease the disclosure of the covered person's protected information, as described in the notice.(b) Data brokers.--Upon notification under subsection (a), 20250HB1822PN2520 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 and not later than 10 20 business days following physical or electronic receipt of the notification, a data broker shall not disclose or redisclose or otherwise make available, including on a publicly accessible Internet website, the protected information of the covered person.(c) Duration.--The nondisclosure shall last for the following time frames:(1) A principal person shall receive coverage for life.(2) An associated person shall receive coverage while connected to a principal person and for 10 years after the connection.§ 905. Enforcement.(a) Civil liability.--A data broker that violates section 904(b) (relating to nondisclosure of protected information) shall be liable to the covered person, the covered person's authorized agent or the covered person's assignee, who may bring a civil action in the appropriate court of common pleas.(b) Criminal liability.--In addition to civil liability, a data broker that violates section 904 recklessly or intentionally is subject to criminal prosecution as follows:(1) A reckless violation of section 904 shall be a misdemeanor of the third degree.(2) An intentional violation of section 904 shall be a misdemeanor of the second degree.(c) Time limits.--(1) A civil action under this section must be commenced within the following periods of limitation:(i) four years from the date the violation occurred; or(ii) for a continuing violation, within four years 20250HB1822PN2520 - 6 - <--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 from the last date the violation occurred.(2) A criminal prosecution under this section must be commenced within the following periods of limitation:(i) two years from the date the violation occurred; or(ii) for a continuing violation, within two years from the last date the violation occurred.(B) TIME LIMITS.--A CIVIL ACTION UNDER THIS SECTION MUST BE COMMENCED WITHIN THE FOLLOWING PERIODS OF LIMITATION:(1) FOUR YEARS FROM THE DATE THE VIOLATION OCCURRED; OR(2) FOR A CONTINUING VIOLATION, WITHIN FOUR YEARS FROM THE LAST DATE THE VIOLATION OCCURRED.(d) (C) Proceedings.--Proceedings shall be in accordance with the following:(1) In a civil judicial proceeding under this chapter, the standard of fault shall be ordinary negligence.(2) In a civil or criminal judicial proceeding under this chapter, it shall not be a defense to liability in the proceeding that the protected information is or was available to the public from other sources or available by inspection of public records.(1) IN A CIVIL JUDICIAL PROCEEDING UNDER THIS CHAPTER:(I) THE STANDARD OF FAULT SHALL BE ORDINARY NEGLIGENCE; AND(II) IT SHALL NOT BE A DEFENSE TO LIABILITY IN THE PROCEEDING THAT THE PROTECTED INFORMATION IS OR WAS AVAILABLE TO THE PUBLIC FROM OTHER SOURCES OR AVAILABLE BY INSPECTION OF PUBLIC RECORDS.(3) (2) A party accessing a data broker's website or other products or services, for the purpose of determining 20250HB1822PN2520 - 7 - <--<--<--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 whether the covered person's protected information is disclosed, shall not, as a result of the access, be deemed to have agreed on behalf of the covered person or the covered person's authorized agent or assignee to any website terms and conditions with respect to the covered person, associated person or the covered person or associated person's assignee's rights under this chapter.(4) (3) No prior verification of a covered person's status shall be required for the notice under section 904 to be effective. It shall be an affirmative defense to liability that a person is not a covered person.(e) (D) Limitation.--A disclosure of protected information is not a violation of this chapter if the disclosure is:(1) made with the express authorization of the covered person or their authorized agent, contingent upon the authorization being provided subsequent to the relevant nondisclosure request described in section 904; or(2) for the sole purpose of facilitating a transaction initiated by the covered person or their authorized agent.(f) (E) Relief.--In a civil action, for violations of section 904, the court shall award:(1) The greater of actual damages or liquidated damages computed at the rate of $1,000 for each violation of section 904.(2) Punitive damages upon proof of willful or reckless disregard of the law.(3) Reasonable attorney fees and other litigation costs reasonably incurred.(4) Any other preliminary and equitable relief as the court determines to be appropriate.20250HB1822PN2520 - 8 - <--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 § 906. Construction.(a) Liberally construed.--This chapter shall be liberally construed in order to accomplish its purpose.(b) Limitation.--Nothing in this chapter shall preclude any of the following:(1) A covered person from complying with all required disclosure and filing requirements if the covered person is a candidate for public or party office. (2) An individual from challenging the residency of a covered person if the covered person is a candidate for public or party office. Section 2. This act shall take effect immediately.20250HB1822PN2520 - 9 - 123456789101112